Maryland, session 2026, HB1363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
6–233.
(a) In this section, “domestically related crime” means a crime committed by a
defendant against a victim who is a person eligible for relief, as defined in § 4–501 of the
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1363*

HOUSE BILL 1363
Family Law Article, or who had a sexual relationship with the defendant within 12 months
before the commission of the crime.
SUBTITLE 7A. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER REGISTRATION.
11–7A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL CONVICTED
OF A DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME REQUIRED TO REGISTER UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) “DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
6–233 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) “IMPRISONMENT” MEANS INCARCERATION RESULTING FROM A
CONVICTION, REGARDLESS OF THE NATURE OF THE INSTITUTION IN WHICH THE
OFFENDER SERVES THE SENTENCE.
(E) “JURISDICTION” MEANS A STATE OR A NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBE THAT
ELECTS TO FUNCTION AS A REGISTRATION JURISDICTION UNDER FEDERAL LAW.
(F) “LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT” MEANS THE LAW ENFORCEMENT
UNIT IN A COUNTY THAT HAS BEEN DESIGNATED BY RESOLUTION OF THE COUNTY
GOVERNING BODY AS THE PRIMARY LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT IN THE COUNTY.
(G) “SUPERVISING AUTHORITY” MEANS AN AGENCY OR PERSON THAT IS
RESPONSIBLE FOR COLLECTING INFORMATION FOR THE INITIAL REGISTRATION OF
A DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER, INCLUDING:
(1) THE SECRETARY, IF THE REGISTRANT IS IN THE CUSTODY OF A
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OPERATED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(2) THE ADMINISTRATOR OF A LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY, IF
THE REGISTRANT, INCLUDING A PARTICIPANT IN A HOME DETENTION PROGRAM, IS
IN THE CUSTODY OF THE LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY;
(3) THE COURT THAT GRANTED THE PROBATION OR SUSPENDED
SENTENCE, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (9) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE
REGISTRANT IS GRANTED PROBATION BEFORE JUDGMENT, PROBATION AFTER
JUDGMENT, OR A SUSPENDED SENTENCE;

HOUSE BILL 1363 3
(4) THE DIRECTOR OF THE PATUXENT INSTITUTION, IF THE
REGISTRANT IS IN THE CUSTODY OF THE PATUXENT INSTITUTION;
(5) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH, IF THE REGISTRANT IS IN THE
CUSTODY OF A FACILITY OPERATED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH;
(6) THE COURT IN WHICH THE REGISTRANT WAS CONVICTED, IF THE
REGISTRANT’S SENTENCE DOES NOT INCLUDE A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OR IF THE
SENTENCE IS MODIFIED TO TIME SERVED;
(7) THE SECRETARY, IF THE REGISTRANT IS IN THE STATE UNDER
TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR ADULT OFFENDER
SUPERVISION, SET FORTH IN TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES ARTICLE, OR THE INTERSTATE CORRECTIONS COMPACT, SET FORTH IN
TITLE 8, SUBTITLE 6 OF THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE;
(8) THE LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT WHERE THE DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE OFFENDER IS A RESIDENT, IS A TRANSIENT, OR HABITUALLY LIVES ON
MOVING FROM ANOTHER JURISDICTION OR FOREIGN COUNTRY THAT REQUIRES
REGISTRATION IF THE DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER IS NOT UNDER THE
SUPERVISION, CUSTODY, OR CONTROL OF ANOTHER SUPERVISING AUTHORITY; OR
(9) THE DIRECTOR OF PAROLE AND PROBATION, IF THE REGISTRANT
IS UNDER THE SUPERVISION OF THE DIVISION OF PAROLE AND PROBATION.
11–7A–02.
FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON IS CONVICTED WHEN THE
PERSON:
(1) IS FOUND GUILTY OF A CRIME BY A JURY OR JUDICIAL OFFICER;
(2) ENTERS A PLEA OF GUILTY OR NOLO CONTENDERE; OR
(3) IS GRANTED A PROBATION BEFORE JUDGMENT AFTER A FINDING
OF GUILT FOR A CRIME IF THE COURT, AS A CONDITION OF PROBATION, ORDERS
COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
11–7A–03.
(A) (1) A PERSON SHALL REGISTER WITH THE PERSON’S SUPERVISING
AUTHORITY IF THE PERSON IS CONVICTED OF AT LEAST TWO DOMESTICALLY
RELATED CRIMES.

HOUSE BILL 1363
(2) A DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER SHALL REGISTER WITH THE
APPROPRIATE SUPERVISING AUTHORITY IN THE STATE WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER A
SECOND CONVICTION FOR A DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A PERSON IS NO
LONGER SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IF:
(1) THE UNDERLYING CONVICTION REQUIRING REGISTRATION IS
REVERSED, VACATED, OR SET ASIDE; OR
(2) THE REGISTRANT IS PARDONED FOR THE UNDERLYING
CONVICTION.
11–7A–04.
A REGISTRATION STATEMENT SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE REGISTRANT’S FULL NAME, INCLUDING ANY SUFFIX;
(2) A DESCRIPTION OF THE CRIME FOR WHICH THE REGISTRANT WAS
CONVICTED;
(3) THE DATE THAT THE REGISTRANT WAS CONVICTED;
(4) THE JURISDICTION AND THE NAME OF THE COURT IN WHICH THE
REGISTRANT WAS CONVICTED;
(5) ALL IDENTIFYING FACTORS, INCLUDING A PHYSICAL
DESCRIPTION OF THE REGISTRANT;
(6) A COPY OF THE REGISTRANT’S VALID DRIVER’S LICENSE OR
IDENTIFICATION CARD; AND
(7) THE REGISTRANT’S SIGNATURE AND DATE SIGNED.
11–7A–05.
THE TERM OF REGISTRATION IS:
(1) IF THE REGISTRANT HAS ONE PRIOR CONVICTION FOR A
DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME, 2 YEARS;

HOUSE BILL 1363 5
(2) IF THE REGISTRANT HAS AT LEAST TWO PRIOR CONVICTIONS FOR
A DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME, 5 YEARS; OR
(3) IF THE REGISTRANT HAS AT LEAST THREE PRIOR CONVICTIONS
FOR A DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME, 10 YEARS.
11–7A–06.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC
REGISTRATION STATEMENTS OR INFORMATION ABOUT REGISTRATION
STATEMENTS.
(2) INFORMATION ABOUT REGISTRATION STATEMENTS SHALL
INCLUDE, IN PLAIN LANGUAGE THAT CAN BE UNDERSTOOD WITHOUT SPECIAL
KNOWLEDGE OF THE CRIMINAL LAWS OF THE STATE, A FACTUAL DESCRIPTION OF
THE CRIME OF THE OFFENDER THAT IS THE BASIS FOR THE REGISTRATION,
EXCLUDING DETAILS THAT WOULD IDENTIFY THE VICTIM.
(3) REGISTRATION INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE PUBLIC MAY
NOT INCLUDE A DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OFFENDER’S SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER,
DRIVER’S LICENSE NUMBER, OR ARRESTS NOT RESULTING IN CONVICTION.
(4) A REGISTRATION STATEMENT PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
SHALL INCLUDE A COPY OF THE COMPLETED REGISTRATION FORM AND A COPY OF
THE REGISTRANT’S DIGITAL IMAGE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL POST ON THE INTERNET:
(1) A CURRENT LISTING OF EACH REGISTRANT, INCLUDING EACH
REGISTRANT’S:
(I) NAME;
(II) DATE OF BIRTH;
(III) DATE OF CONVICTION;
(IV) JURISDICTION OF THE CONVICTION; AND
(V) DIGITAL IMAGE; AND
(2) IN PLAIN LANGUAGE THAT CAN BE UNDERSTOOD WITHOUT
SPECIAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE CRIMINAL LAWS OF THE STATE, A FACTUAL

HOUSE BILL 1363
DESCRIPTION OF THE CRIME OF THE OFFENDER THAT IS THE BASIS FOR THE
REGISTRATION, EXCLUDING DETAILS THAT WOULD IDENTIFY THE VICTIM.
11–7A–07.
(A) A REGISTRANT MAY NOT KNOWINGLY FAIL TO REGISTER, KNOWINGLY
FAIL TO PROVIDE ANY INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN A REGISTRATION
STATEMENT DESCRIBED IN § 11–7A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE, OR KNOWINGLY PROVIDE
FALSE INFORMATION OF A MATERIAL FACT AS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION:
(1) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $250;
(2) FOR A SECOND OFFENSE, IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $500; AND
(3) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90 DAYS OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH.
11–7A–08.
(A) WITH ADVICE FROM THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION ADVISORY
BOARD ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–207 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE SECRETARY SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE SECRETARY MAY ESTABLISH A REASONABLE REGISTRATION FEE
TO RECOVER THE COSTS OF MANAGING THE REGISTRY AND ELECTRONICALLY
POSTING REGISTRY INFORMATION.
(C) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL USE THE
EXISTING RESOURCES IN THE SEX OFFENDER REGISTRY UNDER SUBTITLE 7 OF
THIS TITLE TO IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.